Hawaii, session 2026, HB944.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that neighborhood boards provide easy public access to decision-making on a local level, allowing residents an opportunity to discuss issues affecting more localized areas.  Members of neighborhood boards often consider the most basic concerns of residents, such as street parking, local crime statistics, bus routes, and park facilities. The legislature further finds that because many of these concerns require an investment in public funds through the capital improvement program or operating budget allocation, it is appropriate that the neighborhood boards should have an officially recognized role in suggesting capital improvement projects and operating budget priorities. The purpose of this Act is to establish a systematic process in which neighborhood boards can solicit recommendations for capital improvement projects and priorities for the operating budget of the county. SECTION 2.  Chapter 46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§46-     Neighborhood board; budget recommendations.  (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each county mayor shall consider the suggestions for capital improvement projects and operating budget priorities submitted by each neighborhood board in the respective county pursuant to section 92-   . (b) After reviewing the respective suggestions for capital improvement projects and operating budget priorities, the county mayor shall provide a written response to each recommendation. The written response shall describe how the recommendation is being included in the mayor's budget submission to the respective county council or, if not, why the recommendation is not being included. (c)  Each county council, in its review and approval of the respective mayor's budget, shall consider the mayor's written response to each neighborhood board's recommendations." SECTION 3.  Chapter 92, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part VII to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§92-     Neighborhood board; capital improvement project; operating budget priorities; recommendations.  (a)  All neighborhood boards subject to this part shall follow a uniform process and procedure to solicit suggestions for capital improvement projects and operating budget priorities from residents; provided that the processes and procedures shall be determined by the respective county-based commission that oversees neighborhood boards. (b)  Public meetings to solicit suggestions for capital improvement projects and operating budget priorities from residents shall be subject to this chapter. (c) Each respective neighborhood board shall provide ample notice to its respective community that suggestions for capital improvement projects and operating budget priorities are being solicited. (d) Once suggestions from the community have been collected, the neighborhood board shall conduct a subsequent meeting for board members to vote on a recommended package of recommendations to be submitted to the respective county mayor.  Each package of recommendations shall include a target number of recommendations and a related total value of operating budget suggestions, subject to requirements by the appropriate county-based commission that oversees neighborhood boards. (e) Upon receipt of the package of recommendations submitted pursuant to subsection (d), each county mayor shall include in the mayor's proposed budget a written response to each recommendation, describing how it will be included in the mayor's proposed budget to the county council or, if not, why it will not be included. (f)  When the county council reviews, amends, and approves the mayor's proposed budget, the county council shall consider the mayor's written response to each recommendation in the neighborhood board's package of recommendations and decide the final county budget after considering the package of recommendations submitted by the neighborhood board, the mayor's written responses, and the overall fiscal health of the county.  If the mayor does not respond to any recommendation included in a neighborhood board's package of recommendations pursuant to subsection (e), the county council shall include that recommendation in the budget, subject to amendment by the county council." SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________